Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.090

License—Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license in another state or a province of Canada may be licensed to practice in this state if the secretary determines that the licensing standards of the other state or province are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards in this chapter.

[ 2015 c 118 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.